Illinois, session 104th, SB3887.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Screen 5Illinois Initiative Act. 6    Section 5. Findings and purpose.7    (a) The General Assembly finds that:8        (1) Preventive health screenings are key to spotting 9    diseases early. Some common diseases that screenings can 10    find are chronic conditions, cancer, metabolic issues, and 11    infections. Finding these issues early can reduce illness, 12    death, and long-term healthcare costs through quick, 13    non-invasive tests.14        (2) Standardized, evidence-based preventive screening 15    statistics developed by the United States Department of 16    Health and Human Services Office of Disease Prevention and 17    Health Promotion Healthy People 2030 (HP2030) suggest that 18    Illinois falls short of the recommended adult screening 19    targets:20            (A) only 6.3% of adults between 50 and 80 years old 21        are screened for lung and bronchial cancer;22            (B) only 66.7% of adults between 45 and 75 years 23        old are screened for colorectal cancer;  SB3887- 2 -LRB104 19648 TRT 33097 b1            (C) only 73.1% of female adults 40 years old and 2        older are screened for breast cancer; and3            (D) only 69.1% of female adults between the ages 4        of 21 and 65 years old are screened for cervical 5        cancer.6        (3) In addition, significant racial disparities exist 7    in prostate screening, with only 17.3% of 50 to 8    69-year-old Hispanic males and 29.4% of 50 to 69-year-old 9    African-American males being screened for prostate cancer.10        (4) The Department has reported a high percentage of 11    late-stage cancer diagnoses because of potential missed 12    preventive care, such as:13            (A) 45.4% of adults 50 years old and older with a 14        lung and bronchus cancer diagnosis;15            (B) 24.1% of all adults with a colorectal cancer 16        diagnosis;17            (C) 45.6% of all female adults with a breast 18        cancer diagnosis; and19            (D) 24.0% of male adults 50 years old and older 20        with a prostate cancer diagnosis.21        (5) When cancers are detected at a late stage, 22    treatment options available become more expensive and more 23    difficult. Consequently, cancer mortality rates for the 24    cancers listed below are high compared to the Healthy 25    People 2030 targets:26            (A) Lung and bronchus cancer: 41.1 deaths per   SB3887- 3 -LRB104 19648 TRT 33097 b1        100,000 people (HP2030: 25.1),2            (B) Colorectal cancer: 14.7 deaths per 100,000 3        people (HP2030: 8.9),4            (C) Breast cancer: 21.0 deaths per 100,000 people 5        (HP2030: 15.3),6            (D) Prostate cancer: 20.0 deaths per 100,000 7        people (HP2030: 16.9).8        (6) Residents of rural parts of the State are more 9    likely to be affected by the limited preventive public 10    health screenings due to fewer healthcare professionals, 11    medical centers, emergency facilities, or transportation 12    options to these services.13        (7) While the Illinois Department of Public Health 14    operates mobile health screening initiatives, such as 15    Wellness on Wheels (WoW), its funding is grant-based and 16    not stable, relies on a request system for statewide 17    access, has narrow screening panels, and does not have 18    standardized referral and follow-up protocols. 19    Specifically:20            (A) Wellness on Wheels funding is variable, having 21        received:22                (i) $5,766,350 in FY 2023;23                (ii) $695,000 in FY 2024;24                (iii) $515,000 in FY 2025; and25                (iv) $1,075,000 in FY 2026.26            (B) These funds go toward providing variable   SB3887- 4 -LRB104 19648 TRT 33097 b1        grants to community organizations, instead of having a 2        stable funding stream. As a result, these 3        organizations are unable to provide consistent 4        statewide screenings to rural communities. The 5        inconsistent annual funding toward Wellness on Wheels 6        also makes it difficult for the initiative to plan its 7        resources, professionals, and services.8            (C) Furthermore, Wellness on Wheels mobile health 9        screening units have hubs in just 5 areas:10                (i) Joliet;11                (ii) Springfield;12                (iii) Champaign;13                (iv) O'Fallon; and14                (v) Grand Chain.15            (D) The limited number of locations makes it 16        difficult for mobile health screening units to reach 17        rural areas of the State quickly. These inefficiencies 18        can lead to delays in screening, increasing the risk 19        of cancers or other diseases that go undetected, thus 20        significantly increasing the risk of worsened symptoms 21        and more expensive care.22            (E) Wellness on Wheels also predominantly focuses 23        on screening for diseases and conditions, such as:24                (i) Human Immunodeficiency Virus;25                (ii) Hepatitis C;26                (iii) Sexually transmitted infections, such as   SB3887- 5 -LRB104 19648 TRT 33097 b1            Gonorrhea and Chlamydia;2                (iv) COVID-19;3                (v) high blood pressure;4                (vi) high glucose levels; and5                (vii) high cholesterol.6            (F) Wellness on Wheels does not focus on screening 7        for cancer or other common diseases, potentially 8        leaving those conditions undetected for long periods.9            (G) While grants given to community organizations 10        through Wellness on Wheels have a stipulation to 11        provide care linkage and, as needed, wrap-around 12        services, the grantees are responsible for managing 13        follow-ups and referrals. Because of this, there is no 14        statewide, standardized organization providing the 15        actual medical services or follow-up referrals leaving 16        it to the local organizations to provide it. This 17        creates inefficiencies and inconsistencies between 18        regions of the State, as different community 19        organizations may vary in the methodology, frequency, 20        or quality of screenings. The creation of a statewide 21        authority to conduct follow-ups and referrals will 22        standardize screenings and improve quality throughout 23        the State.24            (H) Thus, the creation of a statewide, 25        standardized mobile health screening framework will 26        improve screening in disadvantaged communities, reduce   SB3887- 6 -LRB104 19648 TRT 33097 b1        average mortality, and decrease healthcare costs for 2        underserved and rural constituents.3    (b) The purpose of this Act is to:4        (1) expand and formalize the Department of Public 5    Health's existing mobile public health screening 6    initiatives, such as Wellness on Wheels, and to create a 7    standardized, statewide program delivering high-quality 8    screening to rural and underserved communities;9        (2) establish a stable, sufficient State funding 10    source for the newly created statewide screening program, 11    to improving consistency and service;12        (3) standardize the range of diseases supported for 13    screening by mobile health units, including cancer, 14    metabolic, cardiovascular, or vaccine-preventable 15    diseases, thus improving detection speed;16        (4) establish statewide, standardized follow-up and 17    referral guidelines to ensure constituents are screened 18    quickly;19        (5) expand the geographic range and frequency of 20    mobile public health screening initiatives to reduce the 21    barriers to healthcare such as a lack of transportation; 22    and23        (6) record screening data through the Department to 24    inform government policy and future funding for mobile 25    health screening programs.   SB3887- 7 -LRB104 19648 TRT 33097 b1    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:2    "Department" means the Illinois Department of Public 3Health.4    "Fixed-site preventive screening services" means 5screenings that happen at a consistent location such as at a 6clinic or hospital.7    "Follow-up care" means further diagnostic testing or 8referral to a healthcare service after an abnormal or positive 9result.10    "Medically underserved urban neighborhoods" means zip 11codes designated by the Health Resources and Services 12Administration as being a Primary Health Professional Shortage 13Area or a Medically Underserved Area/Population.14    "Mobile health screening unit" means a group of vehicles 15operated or contracted by the Department delivering preventive 16health screenings.17    "Preventive health screenings" means an evidence-based 18clinical test used to detect any disease or conditions before 19symptoms.20    "Underserved community" means a geographic area or 21population identified by the Department that has limited 22access to healthcare services due to economic or structural 23barriers, 24    Section 15. Program Requirements.25    (a) The Department shall build upon existing Wellness on   SB3887- 8 -LRB104 19648 TRT 33097 b1Wheels and the Department's infrastructure to establish the 2Screen Illinois Initiative and all of its requirements. The 3Screen Illinois Initiative program shall act as a statewide, 4proactive mobile health screening initiative.5    (b) No later than January 1, 2028, the Department shall 6increase the number of mobile health screening unit hubs from 7the current 5 to a number sufficient to ensure every region of 8the State has access to a mobile health screening unit within 9one hour's distance, as determined by geographic analysis 10conducted by the Department.11        (1) Through the Screen Illinois Initiative, the 12    Department shall target achieving at least 20,000 annual 13    screenings by January 1, 2028.14        (2) Through the Screen Illinois Initiative, the 15    Department shall target achieving a follow-up completion 16    rate by at least 75% by January 1, 2028.17    (c) The Department shall prioritize mobile health 18screening unit deployment through the Screen Illinois 19Initiative to:20        (1) counties and census tracts that are designated as 21    a medically underserved urban neighborhoods or an 22    underserved community;23        (2) counties with cancer screening rates lower than 24    the statewide average, as reported in the Department's 25    Illinois Comprehensive Cancer Control Plan; and26        (3) counties where residents must travel at least 20   SB3887- 9 -LRB104 19648 TRT 33097 b1    miles to access fixed-site preventive screening services.2    (d) The Department shall ensure that each health region 3has at least 3 mobile health screening unit hubs responsible 4for:5        (1) route planning;6        (2) staff coordination;7        (3) follow-up and referral handling; and8        (4) equipment storage and maintenance.9    (e) No deployment under this Act shall require a formal 10request from a community organization, nonprofit, or local 11government for screenings to occur in a region. The Department 12shall grant the right for parties of interest to express their 13opinions on the Screen Illinois Initiative's county and region 14priorities and reserve the right to modify the deployment of 15mobile health screening units as necessary.16    (f) Subject to appropriation, the funding received by the 17Screen Illinois Initiative from the Department shall be used 18to support the operations of the mobile health screening units 19and hubs of the Screen Illinois Initiative by covering:20        (1) the purchase and for maintenance of vehicles;21        (2) the salary of clinical staff and transportation 22    workers;23        (3) the purchase and maintenance of clinical 24    equipment;25        (4) the costs of daily operations, including, but not 26    limited to, facility costs, outreach administrators'   SB3887- 10 -LRB104 19648 TRT 33097 b1    salaries, and advertising costs; and2        (5) the costs of data collection, reporting, and 3    organization.4    (g) The Screen Illinois Initiative shall conduct, at a 5minimum, the following additional services:6        (1) cancer screenings, including screenings for lung 7    and bronchus cancer, colorectal cancer, breast cancer, 8    cervical cancer, prostate cancer, and any other screenings 9    clinically recommended by the Department;10        (2) metabolic and cardiovascular risk assessments, 11    including assessments for body mass index, kidney 12    function, liver function, and other assessments as 13    clinically recommended by the Department; and14        (3) vaccine-preventable disease screenings as 15    recommended by the Department.16    (h) The Department shall establish standardized, statewide 17follow-up and referral protocols through the Screen Illinois 18Initiative, such as:19        (1) automatically scheduling and coordinating at least 20    80% of follow-up appointments at health care clinics for 21    individuals with abnormal testing results within 30 days 22    of notification of the result;23        (2) assigning 2 patient navigators to each mobile 24    health screening unit hub to assist constituents with 25    getting screened, navigating insurance policies, and 26    finding transportation services;  SB3887- 11 -LRB104 19648 TRT 33097 b1        (3) providing language translation services for 2    constituents who are not fluent in English; and3        (4) establishing a standardized, statewide database in 4    the Screen Illinois Initiative to:5            (A) record all screening results, follow-up 6        status, and registration information;7            (B) send automated reminders to patients and 8        providers after 7, 14, and 21 days if an appointment 9        has not been scheduled or attended; and10            (C) flag patients for further screening and 11        escalation if no follow-up happens within 60 days.12    (i) The Screen Illinois Initiative shall submit quarterly 13reports to the Department that include the following data:14        (1) the number of screenings performed and categorized 15    by disease or condition, age group, race and ethnicity, 16    county, and population served, including whether it is a 17    primary health professional shortage area or a medically 18    underserved area or population;19        (2) the number and percentage of individuals who were 20    referred for follow-up care and the follow-up completion 21    percentages;22        (3) the statistics regarding the amount of patients at 23    certain stages of cancer when diagnosed through Screen 24    Illinois Initiative; and25        (4) the initiative's operational metrics, including 26    the number of mobile health screening unit hubs, staffing   SB3887- 12 -LRB104 19648 TRT 33097 b1    levels, and average travel time for screenings.2    (j) On December 31st of each year, the Department shall 3release a publicly-accessible annual report regarding the 4Screen Illinois Initiative and its operation, including the 5complied data required under subsection (i) of this Section. 6    Section 20. Screen Illinois Initiative Education Program.7    (a) The Department through the Screen Illinois Initiative 8shall implement a statewide education and outreach program to 9complement its mobile health screening unit initiative by:10        (1) collaborating to create educational flyers and 11    materials to be distributed in local libraries, schools, 12    and other public places that the Department sees fit to 13    spread information regarding the importance of early 14    screening for diseases, the statistics about common 15    diseases in State, and the statistics regarding current 16    screening rates, how the Screen Illinois Initiative 17    operates, and how members of the public can get involved 18    with the Screen Illinois Initiative; and19        (2) conducting quarterly workshops for local 20    healthcare providers to learn more about the Screen 21    Illinois Initiative's services, its standardized referral 22    and follow-up policies, and its updated clinical 23    guidelines as recommended by the Department.24    (b) The Department through the Screen Illinois Initiative 25shall monitor the number of educational events conducted,   SB3887- 13 -LRB104 19648 TRT 33097 b1participants reached, materials distributed, and provider 2trainings completed to include in the annual report by the 3Department required under subsection (j) of Section 15 of this 4Act. 5    Section 25. Rulemaking. The Department shall adopt any 6rules necessary to adopt and enforce the provisions of this 7Act, including, but not limited to, rules regarding the 8operation and staffing of mobile screening hubs, the screening 9services and the purchase of clinical equipment, the 10standardized referral and follow-up system, the education and 11outreach program, and the data collection, reporting, and 12public visibility of the Screen Illinois Initiative.